Utah statutes.
63J-1-218.   Reduction in federal funds -- Agencies to reduce budgets.

(1)  In any fiscal year in which federal grants to be received by state agencies, departments, divisions, or institutions are reduced below the level estimated in the appropriations acts for that year, the programs supported by those grants must be reduced commensurate with the amount of the federal reduction unless the Legislature appropriates state funds to offset the loss in federal funding.

(2)  This program modification shall be reported to the Legislature through the Executive Appropriations Committee and the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst.



Amended by Chapter 1, 2013 Special Session 2 

Amended by Chapter 2, 2013 Special Session 2

